Arkansas, session 2025, HB1468.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 4, Chapter 75, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 15 — Claims Against Home Improvement Contractors, Residential
Building Contractors, and Suppliers

4-75-1501. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Action" means:
(A) A civil action; or
(B) An arbitration proceeding;
(2) "Claim" means a request or demand to remedy a construction
defect caused by a home improvement contractor, residential building
contractor, or supplier related to the construction of a dwelling;
(3) "Claimant" means the owner, tenant, or lessee of a dwelling
*MBM099*
04-02-2025 10:42:27 MBM099

As Engrossed: H3/17/25 S4/2/25 HB1468
who has standing to sue a home improvement contractor, residential building
contractor, or supplier regarding a construction defect;
(4) "Construction defect" means:
(A) In those cases where the home improvement contractor,
residential building contractor, or supplier has provided a warranty to the
consumer, the definition of "defect" in the warranty provided to the consumer
by the home improvement contractor, residential building contractor, or
supplier; or
(B) In all other cases, a deficiency in the construction
of a dwelling that results from one (1) or more of the following:
(i) Defective material;
(ii) Violation of applicable codes; or
(iii) Failure to follow accepted grade standards for
workmanlike construction;
(5) "Dwelling" means:
(A) Any premises or portion of a premises that is used as
a home or a place of residence; and
(B) That part of the lot or site on which the dwelling is
situated that is devoted to residential use;
(6) “Home improvement contractor” means any person, firm,
partnership, copartnership, association, corporation, or other organization
or any combination thereof that attempts to or submits a bid or contracts,
undertakes, or assumes charge in a supervisory capacity or otherwise manages
the reconstruction, alteration, renovation, modification, improvement,
removal, demolition, or addition to any:
(A) Preexisting single family residence; or
(B) Property and structures appurtenant to a preexisting
single family residence;
(7) “Residential building contractor” means the same as defined
under § 17-25-502; and
(8) “Supplier” means a person that manufactures or provides
windows or doors for a dwelling.

4-75-1502. Claims against home improvement contractors, residential
building contractors, and suppliers.
(a) Before commencing an action against a home improvement contractor,
04-02-2025 10:42:27 MBM099

As Engrossed: H3/17/25 S4/2/25 HB1468
residential building contractor, or supplier regarding a construction defect
found within one (1) year after completion of a dwelling, a claimant shall:
(1) At least twenty-eight (28) days before commencing the
action, deliver written notice to the home improvement contractor,
residential building contractor, or supplier containing a description of the
claim in sufficient detail to explain the nature of the alleged construction
defect and the known results of the alleged construction defect; and
(2) Provide the home improvement contractor, residential
building contractor, or supplier with the opportunity to repair or to remedy
the alleged construction defect.
(b) Within fourteen (14) days of delivery of the written notice under
subsection (a) of this section, the home improvement contractor, residential
building contractor, or supplier shall deliver a written response to the
claimant that shall:
(1) Propose to inspect the dwelling that is subject of the claim
and to complete the inspection within a specified timeframe;
(2) Offer to remedy all or part of the claim without an
inspection; or
(3) Dispute the claim.
(c) Based on findings of an inspection under subsection (b)(1) of this
section, a home improvement contractor, residential building contractor, or
supplier may:
(1) Offer to remedy all or part of the claim; or
(2) Dispute the claim.
(d) The claimant may commence an action against the home improvement
contractor, residential building contractor, or supplier for the defect
described in the written notice under subsection (a) of this section without
further notice if:
(1) The home improvement contractor, residential building
contractor, or supplier:
(A) Disputes the claim;
(B) Does not respond to the claimant's notice of claim
within the fourteen (14) day timeframe under subsection (b) of this section;
or
(C) Fails to fulfill an offer to remedy all or part of a
claim after the acceptance of the offer by the claimant; or
04-02-2025 10:42:27 MBM099

As Engrossed: H3/17/25 S4/2/25 HB1468
(2) The claimant does not accept an offer to remedy all or part
of a claim made under this section.
(e)(1) A claimant accepting the offer of a home improvement
contractor, residential building contractor, or supplier to remedy all or
part of the construction defect under subsection (b) or (c) of this section
shall do so by serving a written notice of acceptance to the home improvement
contractor, residential building contractor, or supplier.
(2) The claimant under subdivision (e)(1) of this section shall:
(A) Serve the notice of acceptance under subdivision
(e)(1) of this section to the home improvement contractor, residential
building contractor, or supplier no later than thirty (30) days after receipt
of the offer; and
(B) Provide the home improvement contractor, residential
building contractor, or supplier and its subcontractors or other agents
reasonable access to the dwelling during normal working hours to perform and
complete the construction or work by the timetable stated in the offer.
(f) If a claimant accepts an offer made in compliance with this
section and the home improvement contractor, residential building contractor,
or supplier fulfills the offer in compliance with this section, the claimant
shall be barred from bringing an action for the claim described in the notice
of claim.
(g) A home improvement contractor, residential building contractor, or
supplier shall provide the owner, tenant, or lessee of the dwelling written
notice of the requirements of this subchapter before commencing the building
or improving of the dwelling.
(h) This section does not apply to actions brought by the Attorney
General for civil enforcement of the Deceptive Trade Practices Act, § 4-88-
101 et seq., including without limitation:
(1) Mediations initiated in connection with an action brought by
the Attorney General for civil enforcement of the Deceptive Trade Practices
Act, § 4-88-101 et seq.; and
(2) Consumer actions brought by the Attorney General for civil
enforcement of the Deceptive Trade Practices Act, § 4-88-101 et seq.

/s/Cozart

04-02-2025 10:42:27 MBM099